Arkansas, session 2025, SB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-56-309. Testing of processed marijuana product — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, "processed marijuana product" means a
marijuana product intended for human consumption that has been altered from
the usable marijuana under the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016,
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, by extraction, concentration,
encapsulation, chemical manipulation, or other process.
(2) "Processed marijuana product" includes without limitation
edibles, oils, concentrations, tinctures, topicals, inhalables, and other
forms of marijuana that have been infused or processed.
(3)(A) "Processed marijuana product" is separate and distinct
from marijuana paraphernalia that requires the combustion of marijuana to be
properly utilized, including pipes, water pipes, bongs, chillums, rolling
papers, and roach clips.
(B) "Processed marijuana product" is not subject to
*JMB290*
03-12-2025 14:01:23 JMB290

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB305
prohibitions that are applicable to paraphernalia.
(b) All processed marijuana products shall be tested after being fully
processed and in the form of a finished product suitable for packaging.
(c) The testing under this section shall comply with the rules of the
Department of Health and include without limitation the testing of:
(1) Pesticides;
(2) Heavy metals;
(3) Microbiological contaminants;
(4) Residual solvents; and
(5) Concentrations of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol.
(d) This section does not authorize or prohibit any specific product
including without limitation prerolls, blunts, or any other ready-made
inhalables.

/s/C. Penzo





















03-12-2025 14:01:23 JMB290